Hawaii statutes.
§435E-13 Board of trustees. The
reserve trust fund created by such trust agreement shall be administered by a
board of trustees of three or more members, all of whom shall be physicians and
surgeons, participating members in the interindemnity arrangement, and elected
biennially or more frequently by at least a majority of all members
participating in the interindemnity arrangement. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next